Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2767.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 136A.246, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Grant amounts. (a) The maximum grant for an application for the cost of training is deleted text begin $150,000deleted text end new text begin $300,000new text end . The maximum grant for an application for trainee support is ten percent of the grant amount for the cost of training. The maximum total grant per application is deleted text begin $165,000deleted text end new text begin $330,000new text end . A grant may not exceed deleted text begin $6,000deleted text end new text begin $12,000new text end per year for a maximum of deleted text begin $24,000deleted text end new text begin $48,000new text end per employee. (b) An employee who is attending an eligible training provider that is an institution under section 136A.103 must apply for Pell and state grants as a condition of payment for training that employee under this section. Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; DUAL TRAINING COMPETENCY GRANTS.new text end new text begin $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Office of Higher Education for transfer to the dual training competency grants account in the special revenue fund under Minnesota Statutes, section 136A.246, subdivision 10. new text end